Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5200YH (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2594 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 2.34 Legislative clerks. 1 Each member of the house of representatives may hire a 2 legislative clerk, who shall be under the general direction of 3 the member and the chief clerk of the house. A legislative 4 clerk shall be on duty at the house of representatives from 5 8:00 a.m. until 4:30 p.m., Monday through Friday, and on other 6 days as required by the chief clerk of the house, except when 7 excused by the member for whom the clerk works. A legislative 8 clerk shall perform such duties as may be assigned to the 9 legislative clerk by the member or the chief clerk of the house 10 and shall be paid at a rate determined by the chief clerk of the 11 house. 12